sl-SI: Priložene vrste bobnov za ribanje: Sekanje; Čokoladni košček; Groba rešetka; Rezina z naborki; Fina rešetka; Mletje; Rešetka za trdi sir; Ocvrt krompir; Julienne; Mletje oreščkov; Pire; Tračni; Strganje; Rezanje; Rešetka za mehki sir; Zelo fina rešetka; Valovita rezina; Zest; Zoodle; Druga
da: Tromleristtyper medfølger: Flisning; Chokoladestrimler; Grovt revet; Skive med bølger; Fint revet; Malet; Hårdt revet ost; Hakkebrun; Julienne; Nøddeknuser; Puré; Bånd; Rivning; Skæring; Blødt revet ost; Meget fint revet; Bølgende skiver; Citrusskal; Zoodle; Andet
it: Stili di grattugia a tamburo inclusi: Per trucioli; Cioccolato grattugiato; Grattugia grossolana; Fetta ondulata; Grattugia fine; Macinare; Grattugia per formaggio duro; Hash brown; Julienne; Macinazione delle noci; Per purea; Nastro; Per sminuzzare; Per affettare; Grattugia per formaggio morbido; Grattugia molto fine; Fetta increspata; Zest; Zoodle; Altro
fr: Types de râpes incluses: Éclats; Râpé chocolat; Râpe grossière; Tranche ondulée; Râpe fine; Broyage; Râpe à fromage dur; Hash brown; Julienne; Broyage de noix; Purée; Ruban; Déchiquetage; Tranchage; Râpe à fromage tendre; Râpe très fine; Tranche ondulée; Zeste; Spaghetti de légumes; Autre
cs: Zahrnuté bubny podle stylu strouhání: Štěpkování; Čokoládové hoblinky; Hrubé strouhání; Vlnité plátky; Jemné strouhání; Mletí; Strouhání tvrdého sýra; Bramborové placičky; Jemné nudličky (julienne); Mletí ořechů; Pyré; Pásky; Drcení; Krájení; Strouhání měkkého sýra; Velmi jemné strouhání; Vlnité krájení; Citrusová kůra; Cuketové nudle; Jiné
vi: Các kiểu trống bào đi kèm: Thái lát mỏng; Bào sô cô la; Bào sợi to; Thái lát lượn sóng; Bào sợi nhỏ; Xay; Bào phô mai cứng; Bào làm khoai tây bào chiên; Julienne; Nghiền hạt; Nghiền nhuyễn; Ruy-băng; Băm Nhỏ; Cắt lát; Bào phô mai mềm; Bào siêu mịn; Thái lát hình sóng; Bào vỏ chanh; Bào sợi rau củ; Khác
fi: Pakkaukseen sisältyvät rumpuraastimen terätyylit: Murustus; Suklaasilppu; Karkea raaste; Aaltosiivu; Hienoraaste; Jauhatus; Kova juustoraaste; Röstiperunat; Julienne; Jauhettu pähkinä; Soseutus; Nauhaleikkuu; Silppuaminen; Viipalointi; Pehmeä juustoraaste; Erittäin hieno raaste; Aaltoileva siivu; Kuoriraaste; Kesäkurpitsapasta; Muu
pt-PT: Estilos de raladores incluídos: Lascas; Chocolate ralado; Ralado grosso; Fatia frisada; Ralado fino; Moer; Ralador de queijo duro; Batata ralada; Juliana; Moagem de nozes; Puré; Fita; Trituração; Fatiar; Ralador de queijo mole; Ralado muito fino; Fatia ondulada; Raspa; Esparguete de courgette; Outro
sv: Typer av trumrivare som ingår: Flisning; Chokladstrimlor; Grov rivning; Vågskivad; Fin malning; Mala; Hård ostrist; Hash brown; Julienne; Nötmalning; Puré; Band; Fransning; Skivning; Rivare för mjuka ostar; Mycket fin rivning; Vågig skiva; Zest; Zoodle; Övrigt
pl: Bębny tnące w zestawie: Rozdrabnianie; Wiórki czekolady; Grube tarcie; Plastry karbowane; Drobne tarcie; Mielenie; Tarcie twardego sera; Placki ziemniaczane (hash brown); Julienne; Mielenie orzechów; Purée; Wstążki; Szatkowanie; Krojenie w plastry; Tarcie miękkiego sera; Bardzo drobne tarcie; Plastry faliste; Skórka cytrusowa; Spiralne paski warzyw; Pozostałe
zh-CN: 包含的滚筒刨丝样式: 切片; 巧克力刨丝; 粗刨; 波纹切片; 细刨; 研磨; 硬质奶酪磨碎; 薯饼刨; 切丝; 坚果研磨; 打泥; 切条; 刨丝; 切片; 软奶酪刨丝器; 极细刨; 波浪切片; 柑橘皮屑; 西葫芦面条; 其他
tr: Dahil olan tambur rende stilleri: Parça doğrama; Çikolata rendeleme; Kalın rendeleme; Kıvrımlı dilim; İnce rendeleme; Öğütme; Sert peynir rendesi; Röşti kesimi; Jülyen; Fındık öğütme; Püre; Şerit; Rendeleme; Dilimleme; Yumuşak peynir rendesi; Çok ince rendeleme; Dalgalı dilim; Kabuk rendesi; Sebze spagetti (zoodle); Diğer
bg-BG: Включени стилове на решетки за барабани: Рязане на тънки парчета; Настъргване на шоколад; Грубо ренде; Ситно вълнообразно рязане; Фино ренде; Смилане; Ренде за твърдо сирене; Картофени рьошти; Жулиен; Смилане на ядки; Пюре; Лентово; Нарязване на ленти; Нарязване на филийки; Ренде за меко сирене; Много фино ренде; Вълнообразно рязане; За цитрусови кори; За зеленчукови ленти; Друго
ru: Типы барабанов-терок в комплекте: Скалывание; Шоколадная стружка; Крупная терка; Рифленый ломтик; Мелкая терка; Измельчение; Терка для твердого сыра; Картофельные оладьи; Нарезка соломкой; Измельчение орехов; Для пюре; Нарезка лентами; Шинковка; Нарезка ломтиками; Терка для мягкого сыра; Очень мелкая терка; Волнистый срез; Цедра; Лапша из кабачков; Другое
de: Inbegriffene Reibetrommelstile: Hobel; Schokoladenraspeln; Grob; Wellenschnitte; Fein; Schneide; Hartkäsereibe; Kartoffelreibe; Julienne; Nussreibe; Püree; Schleife; Raspeln; Schneiden; Weichkäsereibe; Extra fein; Wellenförmig; Zest; Spiralschneider; Sonstiges
ja: ドラム式おろし器のスタイル: チッピング; チョコレートシュレッド; 粗いすりおろし; クリンクルスライス; 細かいすりおりし; すりつぶし; ハードチーズおろし; ハッシュブラウン; 千切り; ナッツのすりつぶし; ピュレ; リボン; 細切り; スライス; ソフトチーズおろし; 極細すりおろし; ウェーブスライス; ゼスト; ズードル; その他
nl: Meegeleverde raspstijlen: Afsplintering; Chocoladeschaafsel; Grof rooster; Geribbelde plak; Fijn rasp; Malen; Rasp voor harde kaas; Hash brown; Julienne; Noten malen; Puree; Lint; Raspen; Plakjes; Rasp voor zachte kaas; Zeer fijne rasp; Golvende plak; Zest; Zoodle; Overig
lt-LT: Komplekte esančių būgninių tarkų tipai: Čipingas; Šokolado trupinimas; Stambios grotelės; Banguotas pjaustymas; Smulkios grotelės; Malimas; Kietojo sūrio tarka; Bulvių paplotėlis; Julienne; Riešutų malimas; Trinta masė; Juostinis; Smulkinimas; Pjaustymas; Minkšto sūrio tarka; Labai smulkios grotelės; Banguotas pjaustymas; Citruso žievelė; Cukinijos makaronai; Kita
nb: Inkluderte trommelrille-stiler: Avskalling; Sjokoladestrimler; Grov rasp; Krøllete skiver; Fin rist; Mal; Hard osterasp; Røstipotet; Julienne; Nøttkverning; Puré; Bånd; Grovdeling; Skiver; Myk osterasp; Veldig fin rasp; Bølget skive; Zest; Zoodle; Annet
es: Tipos de rallador de tambor incluidos: Astillado; Chocolate rallado; Ralladura gruesa; Rebanada ondulada; Ralladura fina; Moler; Rallar queso duro; Hash brown; Corte en juliana; Molienda de frutos secos; Puré; Cinta; Tiras; Rodajas; Rallar queso blando; Ralladura muy fina; Rebanada ondulada; Cáscara; Fideos de calabacín; Otros
ro-RO: Tipuri de grătar pentru tambur incluse: Ciobire; Răzuire ciocolată; Răzuire grosieră; Feliere ondulată; Răzuire fină; Măcinare; Răzuire brânză tare; Cartofi rași; Julienne; Măcinarea nucilor; Piure; Fâșii; Mărunțire; Feliere; Răzuire brânză moale; Răzuire foarte fină; Feliere ondulată; Coajă rasă; Tăieței de legume; Altele
zh-TW: 包含滾筒刨絲樣式: 切碎; 巧克力碎; 粗刨絲; 波浪切片; 細刨絲; 研磨; 硬起司刨絲; 薯餅; 切絲; 堅果研磨; 壓泥; 切條; 刨絲; 切片; 軟質起司刨絲; 極細刨絲; 波浪切片; 果皮; 櫛瓜麵; 其他
en: Drum grating styles included: Chipping; Chocolate shred; Coarse grate; Crinkle slice; Fine grate; Grind; Hard cheese grate; Hash brown; Julienne; Nut grinding; Puree; Ribbon; Shredding; Slicing; Soft cheese grate; Very fine grate; Wavy slice; Zest; Zoodle; Other
hr-HR: Uključeni stilovi rešetke bubnja: Rezanje na komadiće; Struganje čokolade na trakice; Grubo ribanje; Naborani rez; Sitno ribanje; Mljevenje; Ribanje za tvrdi sir; Za restani krumpir; Julienne; Mljevenje orašastih plodova; Pire; Vrpca; Struganje; Rezanje na ploške; Ribanje za mekani sir; Vrlo sitno ribanje; Valoviti rez; Korica; Rezanci od tikvice; Ostalo
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia sú aj štýly bubnových mriežok: Strúhanie na hobliny; Čokoládové hobliny; Strúhanie na hrubo; Krájanie na vrúbkované plátky; Strúhanie na jemno; Mletie; Strúhadlo na tvrdý syr; Strúhadlo na zemiaky; Julienne; Mletie orechov; Pyré; Páskový; Drvenie; Krájanie na plátky; Strúhadlo na mäkký syr; Strúhanie na veľmi jemno; Vlnkované plátky; Na citrusovú kôru; Na zeleninové rezance; Iné
ko: 드럼 강판 스타일 포함 구성: 치핑; 초콜릿 슈레드; 굵은 강판; 크링클 슬라이스; 고운 강판; 분쇄; 단단한 치즈용 강판; 해시 브라운; 줄리엔; 견과류 분쇄; 퓨레; 리본; 슈레딩; 슬라이싱; 부드러운 치즈용 강판; 아주 고운 강판; 웨이브 슬라이스; 제스트; 주들; 기타
th: รูปแบบของดรัมขูดที่มีให้เลือก: แผ่นขูดแบบสับหยาบ; แผ่นขูดช็อกโกแลต; แผ่นขูดตะแกรงหยาบ; แผ่นสไลซ์แบบลอนหยัก; แผ่นขูดตะแกรงละเอียด; การบด; ตะแกรงชีสแข็ง; แฮชบราวน์; ซอยเป็นเส้นเล็ก; การบดถั่ว; บริสุทธิ์; ริบบิ้น; สับฝอย; สไลซ์; ตะแกรงชีสนุ่ม; ตะแกรงละเอียดมาก; แผ่นสไลซ์แบบลอนคลื่น; แผ่นขูดผิวส้ม; แผ่นทำเส้นผัก (ซูเดิล); อื่นๆ
hu: Tartozék dobrostély-stílusok: Forgácsolás; Csokoládéreszelék; Durva rostély; Cakkos szelet; Finom reszelő; Daráló; Kemény sajtreszelék; Röszti; Julienne; Diódarálás; Püré; Szalag; Aprító; Szeletelő; Lágy sajtreszelék; Nagyon finom rostély; Hullámos szelet; Citrom-/narancshéj; Cukkinitészta; Egyéb
el: Τύποι τυμπάνου κοπής που περιλαμβάνονται: Χονδροκομμένη κοπή; Ξύσμα σοκολάτας; Χονδρό τρίψιμο; Κυματιστή κοπή; Ψιλό τρίψιμο; Άλεσμα; Τρίψιμο σκληρού τυριού; Τρίψιμο για hash brown; Ζουλιέν; Άλεσμα ξηρών καρπών; Πολτοποίηση; Κορδέλα; Τρίψιμο; Κοπή σε φέτες; Τρίψιμο μαλακού τυριού; Πολύ ψιλό τρίψιμο; Κυματιστή φέτα; Ξύσμα (εσπεριδοειδών); Ζουντλ; Άλλο
pt-BR: Estilos de ralador cilíndrico incluídos: Lascas; Chocolate ralado; Ralo grosso; Fatia ondulada; Ralo fino; Moagem; Ralador de queijo duro; Corte palito fino; Julienne; Moagem de nozes; Puro; Fita; Corte em tiras; Fatiamento; Ralo para queijos macios; Ralo muito fino; Fatia ondulada; Raspas; Espiralizador de vegetais; Outro